Maryland, session 2025, SB0903.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Public Utilities
7–207.
(b) (1) (IV) 1. IN THIS SUBPARAGRAPH, “FAST TRACK PROJECT”
HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 7–207.4 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
2. NOTWITHSTANDING ANY OTHER PROVISION OF THIS
SECTION, A CERTIFICATE OF PUBLIC CONVENIENCE AND NECESSITY FOR THE
CONSTRUCTION OF A FAST TRACK PROJECT SHALL BE ISSUED IN ACCORDANCE WITH
§ 7–207.4 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(c) (1) On receipt of an application for a certificate of public convenience and
necessity under this section, the Commission shall provide notice immediately or require
the applicant to provide notice immediately of the application to:
(i) the Department of Planning;
(ii) the governing body, and if applicable the executive, of each
county or municipal corporation in which any portion of the generating station, overhead
transmission line, or qualified generator lead line is proposed to be constructed;
(iii) the governing body, and if applicable the executive, of each
county or municipal corporation within 1 mile of the proposed location of the generating
station, overhead transmission line, or qualified generator lead line;
(iv) each member of the General Assembly representing any part of
a county in which any portion of the generating station, overhead transmission line, or
qualified generator lead line is proposed to be constructed;
(v) each member of the General Assembly representing any part of
each county within 1 mile of the proposed location of the generating station, overhead
transmission line, or qualified generator lead line;
(vi) for a proposed overhead transmission line, each owner of land
and each owner of adjacent land; and
(vii) all other interested persons.
(2) The Commission, when sending the notice required under paragraph
(1) of this subsection, shall forward a copy of the application to:

SENATE BILL 903 3
(i) each appropriate State unit and unit of local government for
review, evaluation, and comment regarding the significance of the proposal to State,
area–wide, and local plans or programs; and
(ii) each member of the General Assembly included under paragraph
(1)(iv) and (v) of this subsection who requests a copy of the application.
(3) On receipt of an application for a certificate of public convenience and
necessity under this section, the Commission shall provide notice of the application on the
Commission’s social media platforms and website.
7–207.4.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “CONSTRUCTION” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 7–207 OF THIS
SUBTITLE.
(3) “DATA CENTER” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 11–239 OF THE
TAX – GENERAL ARTICLE.
(4) “FAST TRACK PROJECT” MEANS THE CONSTRUCTION OF A
GENERATING STATION THAT INCLUDES THE CO–LOCATION OF A DATA CENTER THAT
HAS BEEN AWARDED A FAST TRACK PASS IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 7–218 OF THIS
SUBTITLE.
(5) “GENERATING STATION” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 7–207 OF
THIS SUBTITLE.
(B) THIS SECTION APPLIES ONLY TO AN APPLICATION FOR A CERTIFICATE
OF PUBLIC CONVENIENCE AND NECESSITY FOR THE CONSTRUCTION OF A FAST
TRACK PROJECT.
(C) UNLESS A CERTIFICATE OF PUBLIC CONVENIENCE AND NECESSITY IS
FIRST OBTAINED FROM THE COMMISSION IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SECTION, A
PERSON MAY NOT BEGIN CONSTRUCTION OF A FAST TRACK PROJECT.
(D) WITHIN 90 DAYS AFTER THE SUBMISSION OF AN APPLICATION FOR A
CERTIFICATE OF PUBLIC CONVENIENCE AND NECESSITY THAT INCLUDES AS PART
OF THE APPLICATION A REQUEST FOR VERIFICATION THAT THE CONSTRUCTION OR
MODIFICATION TO A GENERATING STATION HAS RECEIVED A FAST TRACK PASS IN
ACCORDANCE WITH § 7–218 OF THIS SUBTITLE, THE COMMISSION SHALL:

SENATE BILL 903
(1) VERIFY WHETHER THE GENERATING STATION IS A FAST TRACK
PROJECT; AND
(2) NOTIFY THE APPLICANT AND RELEVANT ENTITIES UNDER §
7–207(C) OF THIS SUBTITLE THAT THE APPLICATION IS SUBJECT TO AN EXPEDITED
REVIEW PROCESS IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SECTION.
(E) (1) THE COMMISSION SHALL:
(I) EXPEDITE ALL PROCEEDINGS FOR THE REVIEW AND
APPROVAL OF A CERTIFICATE OF PUBLIC CONVENIENCE AND NECESSITY FOR A FAST
TRACK PROJECT AND PRIORITIZE THESE PROCEEDINGS, IF NECESSARY, OVER
OTHER MATTERS; AND
(II) TAKE FINAL ACTION ON A CERTIFICATE OF PUBLIC
CONVENIENCE AND NECESSITY FOR A FAST TRACK PROJECT NOT LATER THAN 6
MONTHS AFTER THE COMMISSION MAKES THE VERIFICATION UNDER SUBSECTION
(D)(1) OF THIS SECTION.
(2) A STATE AGENCY SHALL SUBMIT ANY RECOMMENDED LICENSING
CONDITIONS OR TESTIMONY REGARDING THE ISSUANCE OF A CERTIFICATE OF
PUBLIC CONVENIENCE AND NECESSITY FOR A FAST TRACK PROJECT NOT LATER
THAN 90 DAYS AFTER THE COMMISSION MAKES THE VERIFICATION UNDER
SUBSECTION (D)(1) OF THIS SECTION.
(F) THE COMMISSION, THE DEPARTMENT OF THE ENVIRONMENT, THE
DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES, AND ANY OTHER IMPACTED STATE
AGENCY SHALL WAIVE OR EXPEDITE ANY REGULATORY REQUIREMENTS OR
DECISIONS TO COMPLY WITH THE TIME FRAMES SET FORTH IN THIS SECTION.
7–218.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “COMMITTEE” MEANS THE DATA CENTER FAST TRACK
ADVISORY COMMITTEE.
(3) “CONSTRUCTION” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 7–207 OF THIS
SUBTITLE.
(4) “DATA CENTER” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 11–239 OF THE
TAX – GENERAL ARTICLE.

SENATE BILL 903 5
(5) “FAST TRACK PASS” MEANS AN EXPEDITED REVIEW PROCESS FOR
A CERTIFICATE OF PUBLIC CONVENIENCE AND NECESSITY ISSUED IN ACCORDANCE
WITH § 7–207.4 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(6) “GENERATING STATION” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 7–207 OF
THIS SUBTITLE.
(B) THERE IS A DATA CENTER FAST TRACK ADVISORY COMMITTEE IN THE
COMMISSION.
(C) THE COMMITTEE CONSISTS OF:
(1) THE COMPTROLLER, OR THE COMPTROLLER’S DESIGNEE;
(2) THE SECRETARY OF COMMERCE, OR THE SECRETARY’S
DESIGNEE;
(3) THE SECRETARY OF THE ENVIRONMENT, OR THE SECRETARY’S
DESIGNEE;
(4) THE CHAIR OF THE COMMISSION, OR THE CHAIR’S DESIGNEE;
(5) THE DIRECTOR OF THE MARYLAND ENERGY ADMINISTRATION,
OR THE DIRECTOR’S DESIGNEE;
(6) THE SECRETARY OF GENERAL SERVICES, OR THE SECRETARY’S
DESIGNEE; AND
(7) THE SECRETARY OF NATURAL RESOURCES, OR THE
SECRETARY’S DESIGNEE.
(D) THE COMMITTEE SHALL:
(1) IN CONSULTATION WITH THE COMMISSION, ESTABLISH CRITERIA
FOR SELECTING PROJECTS FOR THE CONSTRUCTION OR MODIFICATION OF A
GENERATING STATION THAT INCLUDES THE CO–LOCATION OF A DATA CENTER TO
RECEIVE A FAST TRACK PASS, INCLUDING CRITERIA FOR:
(I) ON–SITE ENERGY GENERATION TECHNOLOGY, INCLUDING
BACKUP ENERGY GENERATION AND ENERGY STORAGE TECHNOLOGY;

SENATE BILL 903
(II) EVALUATING A PROJECT’S POWER USAGE EFFECTIVENESS
SCORE CALCULATED IN ACCORDANCE WITH GUIDELINES ESTABLISHED BY THE
MARYLAND ENERGY ADMINISTRATION UNDER § 11–239 OF THE TAX – GENERAL
ARTICLE;
(III) GREEN BUILDING STANDARDS;
(IV) LAND USE AND POTENTIAL REDEVELOPMENT;
(V) WATER USAGE;
(VI) COMMUNITY IMPACT; AND
(VII) ENVIRONMENTAL JUSTICE CONSIDERATIONS; AND
(2) AWARD A FAST TRACK PASS TO SELECTED PROJECTS THAT MEET
THE CRITERIA ESTABLISHED IN ITEM (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION.
(E) A PROJECT THAT RECEIVES A FAST TRACK PASS UNDER THIS SECTION
SHALL UNDERGO AN EXPEDITED REVIEW PROCESS FOR A CERTIFICATE OF PUBLIC
CONVENIENCE AND NECESSITY IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 7–207.4 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(F) (1) ON OR BEFORE SEPTEMBER 1, 2025, AND EACH SEPTEMBER 1
THEREAFTER, THE COMMITTEE SHALL ISSUE AN APPLICATION PERIOD FOR
POTENTIAL PROJECTS FOR THE CONSTRUCTION OR MODIFICATION OF A
GENERATING STATION THAT INCLUDES THE CO–LOCATION OF A DATA CENTER TO
APPLY FOR A FAST TRACK PASS UNDER THIS SECTION.
(2) THE APPLICATION PERIOD UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION SHALL REMAIN OPEN FOR 90 DAYS.
(3) IN EVALUATING APPLICATIONS RECEIVED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1)
OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE COMMISSION:
(I) MAY AWARD NOT MORE THAN THREE FAST TRACK PASSES IN
A YEAR;
(II) SHALL USE THE CRITERIA ESTABLISHED UNDER
SUBSECTION (D)(1) OF THIS SECTION; AND
(III) SHALL AWARD EACH FAST TRACK PASS NOT LATER THAN 30
DAYS AFTER THE CLOSE OF THE APPLICATION PERIOD.

SENATE BILL 903 7
(4) A PROPOSED PROJECT MAY APPLY FOR NOT MORE THAN ONE
FAST TRACK PASS IN A YEAR.
Article – Tax – General
11–239.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Data center” means a building or group of buildings used to house
computer systems, computer storage equipment, and associated infrastructure that
businesses or other organizations use to organize, process, store, and disseminate large
amounts of data.
(3) “Department” means the Department of Commerce.
(4) “Opportunity zone” means an area that has been designated as a
qualified opportunity zone in the State under § 1400Z–1 of the Internal Revenue Code.
(5) (i) “Qualified data center” means a data center located in the State
in which an individual or a corporation, within 3 years after [submitting an application for]
RECEIVING the sales and use tax exemption under this section, has:
1. for a data center located within a Tier I area, invested at
least $2,000,000 in qualified data center personal property and created at least [five]:
A. 35 qualified positions; or
B. 5 QUALIFIED POSITIONS FOR EACH 20,000 SQUARE
FEET OR LESS OF THE DATA CENTER THAT IS NEWLY DEDICATED TO HOUSING
SERVERS; OR
2. for a data center located in any other area of the State,
invested at least $5,000,000 in qualified data center personal property and created at least
[five]:
A. 35 qualified positions; OR
B. 5 QUALIFIED POSITIONS FOR EACH 20,000 SQUARE
FEET OR LESS OF THE DATA CENTER THAT IS NEWLY DEDICATED TO HOUSING
SERVERS.
(ii) “Qualified data center” includes:
1. a data center that is a co–located or hosting data center
where equipment, space, and bandwidth are available to lease to multiple customers; and

SENATE BILL 903
2. an enterprise data center owned and operated by the
company it supports.
(6) (i) “Qualified data center personal property” means personal
property purchased or leased to establish or operate a data center.
(ii) “Qualified data center personal property” includes:
1. computer equipment or enabling software used for the
processing, storage, retrieval, or communication of data, including servers, routers,
connections, and other enabling hardware used in the operation of that equipment;
2. heating, ventilation, and air–conditioning and mechanical
systems, including chillers, cooling towers, air–handling units, pumps, energy storage or
energy efficiency technology, and other capital equipment used in the operation of that
equipment; and
3. equipment necessary for the generation, transformation,
transmission, distribution, or management of electricity, including exterior substations,
generators, transformers, unit substations, uninterruptible power supply systems,
batteries, power distribution units, remote power panels, and any other capital equipment
necessary for these purposes.
(7) (i) “Qualified position” means a position that:
1. is a full–time position of indefinite duration;
2. pays at least 150% of the State minimum wage;
3. is newly created because a data center begins or expands
in a single location in the State; and
4. is filled.
(ii) “Qualified position” does not include a position:
1. created if an employment function is shifted from an
existing data center in the State to another data center of related ownership if the position
is not a net new job in the State;
2. created through a change in ownership of a trade or
business;
3. created through a consolidation, merger, or restructuring
of a business entity if the position is not a net new job in the State;

SENATE BILL 903 9
4. created if an employment function is contractually shifted
from an existing business entity in the State to another business entity if the position is
not a net new job in the State; or
5. filled for a period of less than 12 months.
(8) “Tier I area” means:
(i) a Tier I county as defined in § 1–101 of the Economic
Development Article; or
(ii) an opportunity zone.
(b) The sales and use tax does not apply to the sale of qualified data center
personal property for use at a qualified data center if the buyer provides the vendor with
evidence of eligibility for the exemption issued by the Comptroller.
(c) (1) To qualify for the sales and use tax exemption under subsection (b) of
this section, an individual or a corporation shall file an application for an exemption
certificate with the Department.
(2) The application must:
(i) demonstrate that the applicant intends to meet the requirements
of a qualified data center; [and]
(II) DEMONSTRATE THAT THE DATA CENTER:
1. HAS A POWER USAGE EFFECTIVENESS SCORE OF NOT
MORE THAN 1.2; OR
2. FOR A DATA CENTER THAT IS CO–LOCATED IN A
BUILDING WITH OTHER COMMERCIAL USES AND TAKES NOT MORE THAN 20% OF THE
SQUARE FOOTAGE OF THE BUILDING, ACHIEVES AN ENERGY EFFICIENCY LEVEL
THAT IS AT LEAST AS EFFICIENT AS THE TOP 15% MOST EFFICIENT SIMILAR
BUILDINGS CONSTRUCTED IN THE PREVIOUS 5 YEARS;
(III) DEMONSTRATE THAT AT LEAST 90% OF THE ELECTRICITY
USED BY THE DATA CENTER IS DERIVED FROM CARBON–FREE RENEWABLE ENERGY
SOURCES:
1. LOCATED IN THE PJM INTERCONNECTION, LLC,
SERVICE TERRITORY; OR
2. THROUGH ON–SITE GENERATION;

SENATE BILL 903
(IV) CERTIFY THAT THE DATA CENTER WILL NOT USE ANY
DIESEL FUEL FOR ON–SITE GENERATION, NOT INCLUDING FOR BACKUP
GENERATION; AND
[(ii)] (V) include any information the Department requires to
evidence the capacity and intention of the applicant to fulfill the commitments set forth in
the applicant’s application.
(3) (I) [If,] SUBJECT TO SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF THIS PARAGRAPH,
IF, based on the information and supporting documentation provided in the application,
the Department determines the applicant is eligible for the sales and use tax exemption
under subsection (b) of this section, the Department shall certify the eligibility of the
applicant.
(II) THE DEPARTMENT MAY LIMIT A CERTIFICATION ISSUED
UNDER THIS SECTION BY ALLOWING A QUALIFIED DATA CENTER TO CLAIM A
PARTIAL EXEMPTION UNDER THIS SECTION ONLY UP TO A SPECIFIED DOLLAR
AMOUNT BASED ON THE FOLLOWING ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT PRIORITIES:
1. A COMPARATIVE ANALYSIS BETWEEN THE STATE AND
OTHER STATES IDENTIFYING THE COST DIFFERENTIAL IN THE COSTS OF THE
PROJECT IN THE STATE COMPARED TO THE PROJECTED COSTS IF THE PROJECT HAD
COMMENCED IN ANOTHER STATE, INCLUDING:
A. ANY IMPACT OF THE OTHER STATE’S INCENTIVE
PROGRAMS, INCLUDING SPECIFIC COSTS FOR LABOR, UTILITIES, TAXES, AND ANY
OTHER RELEVANT COSTS; AND
B. THE COST STRUCTURE OF THE TAXPAYER’S INDUSTRY
IN THE OTHER STATE; AND
2. CERTIFIED DOCUMENTATION FROM THE TAXPAYER
TO DEMONSTRATE THAT THE EXEMPTION ALLOWED UNDER THIS SECTION WAS A
SUBSTANTIAL FACTOR IN THE DECISION TO LOCATE THE PROJECT IN THE STATE,
INCLUDING:
A. WHETHER THE TAXPAYER COULD HAVE REASONABLY
AND EFFICIENTLY LOCATED THE PROJECT OUTSIDE THE STATE;
B. EVIDENCE THAT AT LEAST ONE OTHER STATE WAS
CONSIDERED FOR THE PROJECT;

SENATE BILL 903 11
C. DOCUMENTATION THAT RECEIPT OF THE EXEMPTION
UNDER THIS SECTION WAS A MAJOR FACTOR IN THE DATA CENTER’S DECISION; AND
D. CERTIFICATION THAT WITHOUT THE EXEMPTION
ALLOWED UNDER THIS SECTION, THE DATA CENTER WAS NOT LIKELY TO COMMENCE
THE PROJECT IN THE STATE.
(4) THE MARYLAND ENERGY ADMINISTRATION SHALL ESTABLISH
GUIDELINES FOR:
(I) CALCULATING A POWER USAGE EFFECTIVENESS SCORE;
AND
(II) DETERMINING SIMILAR BUILDINGS FOR COMPARISON
UNDER PARAGRAPH (2)(II)2 OF THIS SUBSECTION.
(d) (1) Each year, the Department shall provide the Comptroller with a list of
individuals and corporations that the Department determines are eligible for the sales and
use tax exemption under subsection (b) of this section.
(2) Within 30 days after receiving the list described in paragraph (1) of this
subsection, the Comptroller shall issue to each individual and corporation listed a
certificate of eligibility for the sales and use tax exemption under subsection (b) of this
section.
(3) (i) The certificate of eligibility issued under paragraph (2) of this
subsection:
1. must be renewed each year; and
2. except as provided in subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph, may
not be renewed for more than 10 consecutive years.
(ii) If the individual or corporation invests at least $250,000,000 in
qualified data center personal property, the certificate of eligibility may be renewed for up
to 20 consecutive years.
(e) For at least 3 years after the termination of a certificate issued under
subsection (d) of this section, each individual or corporation that receives the certificate
shall:
(1) maintain a record of:
(i) the amount of sales and use tax that was not paid as a result of
the certificate;

SENATE BILL 903
(ii) the number of qualified positions created; and
(iii) the investment in qualified data center personal property; and
(2) allow the Department to inspect the records described in item (1) of this
subsection.
(f) (1) The Department may revoke a certificate of eligibility under subsection
(d) of this section if any representation made in connection with the application for the
certificate is determined by the Department to have been false when made or if the
applicant has failed to fulfill the applicant’s commitments under the application.
(2) The revocation may be in full or in part as the Department may
determine.
(3) The individual or corporation shall have an opportunity to appeal any
revocation to the Department before notification of the Comptroller.
(4) The Comptroller may make an assessment against the individual or
corporation to recapture any amount of sales and use tax that the individual or corporation
has not paid as a result of an exemption under subsection (b) of this section.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.